Utah statutes.
53-7-308.   Licenses and certificates.
A person may not engage in any of the following activities related to LPG
unless he has obtained an authorizing license or certification from the board:
(1)  container activities: the manufacture, assembly, repair, sale,
installation, or subframing of containers for use in this state, except that a
license is not required for the sale of new containers of 96 pounds water
capacity or less;
(2)  systems activities: the installation, service, or repair of LPG systems
for use in this state, including the laying or connecting of pipes and
fittings connecting with or to systems or servicing a system and appliances to
be used with LPG as a fuel;
(3)  appliance activities: the service, installation, or repair of appliances
used or to be used in this state in connection with systems using LPG as a
fuel; or
(4)  product activities: the sale, transportation, dispensation, or storage of
LPG in this state, except that a license is not required to sell LPG where the
vendor never obtains possessory rights to the product sold or where the
product is transported or stored by the ultimate consumer for personal
consumption only.
